Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2106
Interstate merger
transaction; when prohibited.

An interstate merger transaction
shall not be permitted if, upon consummation of such transaction, the resulting
bank or its bank holding company would have direct or indirect ownership or
control of deposits in Nebraska in excess of twenty-two percent
of the total deposits of all banks in Nebraska, plus the total deposits, savings
accounts, passbook accounts, and share accounts in savings and loan associations
and building and loan associations in Nebraska, as determined by the director
on the basis of the most recent midyear reports, except as
provided in subsection (4), (5), or (6) of section 8-910.

Laws 1997, LB 351, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB851, § 16;

Laws 2012, LB963, § 18.